Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.080

Commission to adopt rules and regulations—Boards may request commission services.

The commission shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the administration of employer-employee relations under this chapter. The boards may request the services of the commission to assist in the conduction of certification elections as provided for in RCW 28B.52.030.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 14; 1973 1st ex.s. c 205 s 5; 1971 ex.s. c 196 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 205: See note following RCW 28B.52.020.